Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 4 Legislative Audit
10-4-408. Disbursing officer — Payment of salaries.

The Legislative Auditor is designated as disbursing officer for Arkansas Legislative Audit.

All vouchers issued in the payment of salaries and expenses incurred in the operations of Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be approved by the Legislative Auditor or the Legislative Auditor's authorized designee or designees before the salaries and expenses are paid.

In case a vacancy exists in the position of Legislative Auditor, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may designate a disbursing agent or agents for Arkansas Legislative Audit who shall serve until the position of Legislative Auditor is filled.

The salary of the Legislative Auditor and the other employees of Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be paid in the same manner and through the same procedure used for the payment of salaries of other state employees.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 850, § 4, provided:

“SALARIES. Employees of the Division of Legislative Audit shall be eligible for cost-of-living increases on July 1, in an amount equal to that granted to all other state agency, board, commission or institution of higher education employees on those dates. Any additional adjustments in annual salary rates for Division employees, labor market adjustments, merit pay adjustments or employee retention or recruitment requirements shall be made at the discretion of the Legislative Auditor. In addition, the Legislative Auditor may implement a merit program to reward employees of the Division for exceptional service. The plan shall be approved by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee prior to its implementation. In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Division of Legislative Audit may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions authorized in the appropriation act after receiving approval from the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. Salary payments in accordance with this section shall not be restricted to maximum amounts authorized by law.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2011 through June 30, 2012.”

Acts 2012, No. 198, § 4, provided: “SALARIES.

Employees of the Division of Legislative Audit shall be eligible for cost-of-living increases on July 1, in an amount equal to that granted to all other state agency, board, commission or institution of higher education employees on those dates. Any additional adjustments in annual salary rates for Division employees, labor market adjustments, merit pay adjustments or employee retention or recruitment requirements shall be made at the discretion of the Legislative Auditor. In addition, the Legislative Auditor may implement a merit program to reward employees of the Division for exceptional service. The plan shall be approved by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee prior to its implementation. In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Division of Legislative Audit may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions authorized in the appropriation act after receiving approval from the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. Salary payments in accordance with this section shall not be restricted to maximum amounts authorized by law.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2012 through June 30, 2013.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (a)(1) and for “the division” in (a)(2), (b), and (c).

It is the intention and desire of the General Assembly to free the Legislative Auditor and his or her staff from partisan politics.

It is declared to be against public policy for any member of the General Assembly or any official or employee of the entities of the state or political subdivisions of the state to recommend or suggest the appointment of any person to a position on the staff of the Legislative Auditor.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by No. 554 substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (a) and for “the division” in (b)(1), (c)(1), and (c)(2); and substituted “an annual” for “a biennial” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1150 substituted “an annual” for “a biennial” in (a).

Ark. L. Rev.

Documentary Evidence — Arkansas, 15 Ark. L. Rev. 79.

As soon as practical after the close of each fiscal year, the Legislative Auditor shall certify to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State the amount of funds expended during the fiscal year just ending which is to be allocated to the state audit function and to the local audit function of Arkansas Legislative Audit.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall utilize this certification in determining those expenses which are eligible to be reimbursed from the Ad Valorem Tax Fund.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (c).

The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with the Government Auditing Standards.

If an annual financial audit of an entity of the state is deemed by the Legislative Auditor as necessary for the audit of the comprehensive annual financial report of the State of Arkansas, then any contract with a private certified public accountant for the entity's annual financial audit shall include provisions requiring the annual financial audit to be completed and filed with Arkansas Legislative Audit by a date determined by the Legislative Auditor.

All reports of the annual financial audit shall be filed with the Legislative Auditor within ten (10) days of issuance of the audit report to the applicable governing body.

Nothing in this subsection limits the authority of the Legislative Auditor to conduct an audit of any entity of the state.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 949, § 27, provided: “SELECTION OF AUDITOR. The Legislative Auditor and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall jointly select the independent auditor to audit the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report for the period ending June 30, 2012.”

Acts 2012, No. 242, § 27, provided: “SELECTION OF AUDITOR. The Legislative Auditor and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall jointly select the independent auditor to audit the Comprehensive Annual Financial Report for the period ending June 30, 2013.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (b)(2).

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the Legislative Auditor shall audit counties and municipalities in the state.

All reports of the annual financial audit shall be filed with the Legislative Auditor within ten (10) days of issuance of the audit report.

Nothing in subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section limits the authority of the Legislative Auditor to conduct an audit of any municipality.

Financial Audits.

The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with the Government Auditing Standards.

Regulatory Basis.

For county and municipal financial audits, the financial statements shall be presented on a fund-basis format with, at a minimum, the general fund and the street or road fund presented separately, and all other funds included in the audit presented in the aggregate.

The financial statements shall consist of the following:

A balance sheet;

A statement of revenues (receipts), expenditures (disbursements), and changes in fund equity (balances);

A comparison of the final adopted budget to the actual expenditures for the general fund and street or road fund of the entity; and

Notes to the financial statements.

The report shall include as supplemental information a schedule of capital assets, including:

Land;

Buildings; and

Equipment.

Agreed-Upon Procedures and Compilation Reports.

All reports shall be filed with the Legislative Auditor within ten (10) days of issuance.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted “of Presentation” following “Basis” in the headings of (b)(2) and (3); substituted “basis” for “presentation” in (b)(3); deleted “Municipal” preceding “Agreed-Upon” in the heading of (c); and substituted “Legislative Joint Auditing Committee” for “Legislative Auditor” in (c)(2).

The 2015 amendment added “and Compilation Reports” in the heading to (c); and inserted “and compilation” following “procedures” in (c)(1), (2), and (3)(A).

Cross References. Required audit inquiry, §12-8-405.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the Legislative Auditor shall audit schools.

(1)(A)A school may retain the services of a licensed certified public accountant or a licensed accountant in public practice in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct an annual financial audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States and the Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States.

If the school is an open-enrollment public charter school in its first year of operation, the Legislative Auditor shall prepare the required annual financial audit for the school unless:

The open-enrollment public charter school chooses to retain the services of a licensed certified public accountant or licensed accountant in public practice under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section; and

The State Board of Education approves the open-enrollment public charter school's use of an entity other than the Legislative Auditor to prepare the annual financial audit.

The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with the Government Auditing Standards.

Every report of an annual financial audit shall be filed with the Legislative Auditor within ten (10) days of issuance of the audit report to the school board.

Nothing in this subsection limits the authority of the Legislative Auditor to conduct an audit of any school.

For school financial audits, the financial statements shall be presented on a fund basis format with, as a minimum, the general fund and the special revenue fund presented separately and all other funds included in the audit presented in the aggregate.

The financial statements shall consist of the following:

A balance sheet;

A statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in fund balances;

A comparison of the final adopted budget to the actual expenditures for the general fund of the entity and the special revenue fund of the entity; and

Notes to the financial statements.

The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with the Government Auditing Standards.

The report shall include as supplemental information a schedule of capital assets, including:

Land;

Buildings; and

Equipment.

The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules necessary to administer the regulatory basis provided in this subsection.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2005, No. 1444, § 1, effective March 31, 2005, amended §10-4-208 to read as follows:

“10-4-208. Audit of schools.

“(a)As used in this section:

“(1)‘Public funds’ means any funds, moneys, receivables, grants, investments, instruments, real or personal property, or other assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, receipts, or disbursements belonging to, held by or for, or passed through a school; and

“(2)‘School’ means any public school district, charter school, educational cooperative, or publicly supported entity having supervision over public educational entities.

“(b)(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, the Legislative Auditor shall conduct audits of all schools and any transactions regarding public funds of the schools.

“(2)(A)(i)However, any school may retain the services of a licensed certified public accountant or a licensed accountant in public practice in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct the annual financial audits in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States and Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States.

“(ii)The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with governmental auditing standards.

“(B)Every report of an annual financial audit shall be filed with the Legislative Auditor within ten (10) days of issuance to the board.

“(C)Nothing in this subsection limits the authority of the Legislative Auditor to conduct an audit of any school.

“(c)Regulatory Basis of Presentation.

“(2)The financial statements shall consist of the following:

“(A)A balance sheet;

“(B)A statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in fund balances;

“(C)A comparison of the final adopted budget to the actual expenditures for the general fund of the entity and the special revenue fund of the entity; and

“(D)Notes to the financial statements.

“(3)The report shall include as supplemental information a schedule of capital assets, including land, buildings, and equipment.

“(4)The State Board of Education shall promulgate the rules necessary to administer the regulatory basis of presentation provided in this subsection.

“(d)Alternative Basis of Presentation.

“(2)The report shall include a report on internal control over financial reporting and on compliance and other matters based on an audit of financial statements performed in accordance with governmental auditing standards.

“(e)(1)The audit report and accompanying comments and recommendations shall be reviewed at the first regularly scheduled meeting following receipt of the audit report if the audit report is received by the board or governing body prior to ten (10) days before the regularly scheduled meeting.

“(2)If the audit report is received by the board or governing body within ten (10) days before a regularly scheduled meeting, the audit report may be reviewed at the next regularly scheduled meeting after the ten-day period.

“(3)The board or governing body shall take appropriate action relating to each finding and recommendation contained in the audit report.

“(4)The minutes of the board or governing body shall document the review of the findings and recommendations and the action taken by the board or governing body.”

This section was subsequently repealed by Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 11, effective April 13, 2005.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted present (b)(1)(B) and redesignated former (b)(1)(B) as (b)(1)(C).

The 2015 amendment deleted “of Presentation” following “Regulatory Basis” in the (c) heading; added present (c)(1)(C) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; deleted “of presentation” following “regulatory basis” in present (c)(1)(E); deleted “of Presentation” following “Alternative Basis” in the (c)(2) heading; in (c)(2)(A), deleted “the presentation prescribed in” following “alternative to,” substituted “adopt a resolution requiring” for “require” near the middle, and substituted “Government” for “Governmental” preceding “Accounting Standards Board” near the end; and substituted “Government” for “Governmental” preceding “Auditing Standards” near the end of (c)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment redesignated former (c)(1) as (c), deleted former (c)(2), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

A balance sheet;

A statement of revenues (receipts), expenditures (disbursements), and changes in fund equity (balances); and

Notes to the financial statements.

The report shall include as supplemental information a schedule of capital assets, including:

Land;

Buildings; and

Equipment.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “of Presentation” following “Regulatory Basis” in the heading to (b).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 11.

10-4-409. Personnel.

Subject to an annual appropriation therefor, all employees of Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be selected and appointed by the Legislative Auditor.

(1)The Legislative Auditor shall be free to select the most efficient personnel available for each position in Arkansas Legislative Audit, to the end that he or she may render to the members of the General Assembly that service which the members have a right to expect.

The Legislative Auditor may conduct such professional examination as he or she may deem expedient in determining the qualifications of the persons whom he or she contemplates placing on his or her staff.

(1)No person related to any member of the General Assembly or to the Legislative Auditor in the first degree of consanguinity or affinity may be employed on the staff of Arkansas Legislative Audit.

However, subdivision (c)(1) of this section does not apply if an individual is initially employed with Arkansas Legislative Audit before his or her relative is elected as a member of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 12; 2015, No. 1150, § 5.

10-4-410. Audit costs.

(1)The Legislative Auditor shall cause to be maintained a sufficient accounting of the audit costs incurred by Arkansas Legislative Audit in auditing entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state.

The audit costs shall provide a basis for determining a reasonable reimbursement from entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state for the cost of auditing federal funds received by these entities.

(1)The administrative cost of auditing political subdivisions of the state shall be paid from the Ad Valorem Tax Fund as prescribed by §19-5-906.

If these taxes or any part thereof are no longer collected or deposited into the State Treasury or if there is a diminution in these taxes, then the operating cost of auditing the political subdivisions of the state incurred by Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be paid from other moneys deposited into the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund.

If it is determined by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee that the reimbursement for the auditing of entities of the state is appropriate, the Legislative Auditor and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall develop guidelines for effecting proper budgetary and accounting procedures for the reimbursements.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 13; 2019, No. 910, § 3373.

10-4-411. Audits of entities of the state.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the Legislative Auditor shall audit entities of the state.

(1)(A)However, any licensing board or with the approval of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee any other entity of the state may retain the services of a licensed certified public accountant or a licensed accountant in public practice in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct the entity's annual financial audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States and the Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 14.

10-4-412. Audits of counties and municipalities.

(A)(i)Any municipality may retain the services of a licensed certified public accountant or a licensed accountant in public practice in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct a financial audit as prescribed in subsection (b) of this section.

(A)For purposes of this subsection, a financial audit shall be planned and conducted, and the results of the work reported in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States and the Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States.

Alternative Basis. As an alternative to the basis prescribed in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the governing body of a municipality or a county may adopt an annual resolution requiring its annual financial audit to be performed and financial statements presented in accordance with the standards prescribed by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, and the United States Government Accountability Office, if applicable.

As an alternative to a financial audit, the Legislative Auditor may conduct an agreed-upon procedures and compilation engagement of the records and accounts of all municipal or county offices, officials, or employees.

For purposes of this subsection, agreed-upon procedures and compilation engagements shall be conducted in accordance with standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and subject to the minimum procedures prescribed by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

(A)Unless otherwise provided by law, the governing body of a municipality may choose and employ accountants licensed and in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct agreed-upon procedures and compilation engagements.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2011, No. 349, § 1; 2015, No. 554, § 15.

10-4-413. Audits of schools.

(c)

Regulatory Basis.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2011, No. 993, § 16; 2015, No. 554, § 16; 2019, No. 867, § 1.

For school financial audits, the financial statements shall be presented on a fund basis format with, as a minimum, the general fund and the special revenue fund presented separately and all other funds included in the audit presented in the aggregate.

As an alternative to the presentation prescribed in subsection (c) of this section, the governing body of a school may require its annual financial audit to be performed and financial statements presented in accordance with the guidelines prescribed by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, and the Government Accountability Office, if applicable.

10-4-414. Audits of prosecuting attorneys.

The Legislative Auditor shall audit prosecuting attorneys in the State of Arkansas.

(b)

Regulatory Basis.

For prosecuting attorney financial audits, the financial statements shall be presented on a fund basis format with, at a minimum, the general fund presented separately and all other funds included in the audit presented in the aggregate.

The financial statements shall consist of the following:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 17.

10-4-415. Monitoring of reports by the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall monitor reports presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to ensure that they meet the needs of:

The General Assembly;

Entities of the state;

Political subdivisions of the state;

Schools; and

The general public.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7.

10-4-416. Access to records.

The Legislative Auditor and authorized employees of Arkansas Legislative Audit shall have access at all times to any books, accounts, reports, electronic data, vouchers, or other records, confidential or otherwise, of any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state that are deemed necessary to audit transactions related to public funds.

Any business contracting with an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state to provide electronic or other access to records of a public entity shall provide Arkansas Legislative Audit access to the public entity's records without charge or reimbursement.

In the performance of the Legislative Auditor's duties, the Legislative Auditor or the Legislative Auditor's authorized assistants may ascertain, inspect, confirm, copy, audit, and examine any financial records, documents, or accounts of any financial institution, business, or nonprofit entity or any other person or entity regarding transactions or relationships with an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

In the investigation of documents, books, and records regarding receipt, expenditure, or disbursement of other funds, the Legislative Auditor shall determine, subject to approval of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or its executive committee, that the investigation of the documents, books, and records is necessary to verify any audit of an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state or to investigate misappropriation of other funds.

No financial institution, business, nonprofit entity, or any other person or entity shall be liable for making available to the Legislative Auditor any of the information required by the Legislative Auditor under this section.

This section does not authorize or permit the Legislative Auditor to release information:

When otherwise prohibited by law; or

Not subject to public inspection under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., or other applicable law.

All records, documents, correspondence, or other data of a person, foundation, nonprofit corporation or any other entity holding other funds that would infringe upon the rights, privacy, or confidentiality of donors of private funds to the person, foundation, nonprofit corporation, or other entity are exempt from public disclosure when in the possession of the Legislative Auditor.

Any working papers or other data relating to the donor information examined by the Legislative Auditor under this chapter are confidential and exempt from public disclosure.

Records that are exempt from public disclosure in the hands of the entity's custodian remain exempt from public disclosure in the hands of the Legislative Auditor and Arkansas Legislative Audit.

Any person knowingly providing false documents, records, or other data to the Legislative Auditor or his or her authorized assistants, upon the finding by a circuit court, shall be guilty of providing false information and shall be punished in the same manner as a person guilty of tampering with a public record, § 5-54-121.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” throughout the section; rewrote (d)(1), inserting “the Legislative Auditor” and the (A) and (B) designations; and added “when in the possession of the Legislative Auditor” at the end of (d)(2)(A).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (d)(2), substituted “Cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee” for “Legislative Joint Auditing Committee cochairs” and added “and are not open to public inspection” at the end; and added (e).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” twice in (a); and, in (b), substituted the first occurrence of “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” and the second and third occurrences for “the division.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment deleted “the Legislative Council and” preceding “the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee” in two places, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2015 amendment inserted “or the Legislative Auditor” following “Auditing Committee” in (f)(1); inserted (f)(2) and redesignated former (f)(2) as (f)(3); and substituted “without limitation” for “but is not limited to” in present (f)(3).

Circuit court did not err in finding a witness in criminal contempt because he did not inform counsel for a legislative audit committee that he had a conflict, but merely left a voicemail that he was not going to appear at the hearing, his reasons for failing to answer a subpoena did not amount to good cause, the petition and order to show cause sufficiently provided the witness with notice that he was accused of criminal contempt, and he did not preserve his sufficiency-of-the-evidence claim.Valley v. Pulaski County Circuit Court, 2014 Ark. 112, 431 S.W.3d 916 (2014).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (a) and (c)(3)(B)(i) and for “the division” in (c)(1),(c)(2), and (c)(3)(A); and substituted “auditing standards” for “the provisions of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants’ Statement on Auditing Standards Number 99” in (c)(2).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 18.

10-4-417. Presentation and filing of audit reports.

All audit reports prepared by Arkansas Legislative Audit and any audit report required to be filed with the Legislative Auditor or Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or a standing committee thereof.

Copies of all audit reports prepared by Arkansas Legislative Audit, and any audit report required to be filed with the Legislative Auditor or Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be presented on the website of Arkansas Legislative Audit in a manner suitable for downloading and printing.

All final reports shall be open to public inspection after presentation to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or after being approved for early release by the cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

(1)The governing body and executive official of an entity of the state or political subdivision of the state shall receive a copy of the entity's audit report prior to presentation to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

Until the reports are presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or approved for early release by the cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the reports are not considered public information and are not open to public inspection.

The exemption from public inspection under subsections (c) and (d) of this section applies to all reports in the custody or possession of any person before presentation of the report to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or approval for early release, regardless of the actual physical location of the report.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2011, No. 349, §§ 2, 3; 2015, No. 554, § 19.

10-4-418. Review of audit report by governing body.

The audit reports and accompanying comments and recommendations relating to any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state shall be reviewed by the applicable governing body if the entity has such a governing body.

(1)The audit report and accompanying comments and recommendations shall be reviewed at the first regularly scheduled meeting following receipt of the audit report if the audit report is received by the governing body at least ten (10) days prior to the regularly scheduled meeting.

If the audit report is received by the governing body less than ten (10) days prior to a regularly scheduled meeting, the audit report shall be reviewed at the regularly scheduled meeting falling within the ten-day period or the next regularly scheduled meeting subsequent to the ten-day period.

The governing body shall take appropriate action relating to each finding and recommendation contained in the audit report.

The minutes of the governing body shall document the review of the findings and recommendations and the action taken by the governing body.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7.

10-4-419. Report of improper or illegal practices.

(1)If an audit report presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or the appropriate standing subcommittee of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee reflects evidence of improper practices of financial administration or inadequacy of fiscal records, the Legislative Auditor shall report the evidence to the appropriate executive official or officials affected thereby and to the governing body of the entity of the state or political subdivision of the state.

If the findings relate to an entity of the state, the Legislative Auditor shall also report the findings to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

If the findings relate to a prosecuting attorney's office, the Legislative Auditor shall also report the findings to the Attorney General for review and appropriate action.

(1)If an audit report presented to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or the appropriate standing subcommittee of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee reflects evidence of apparent unauthorized disbursements or unaccounted-for funds or property by a public official or employee, the Legislative Auditor shall promptly report the transactions in writing to the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the entity of the state or the political subdivision of the state is located, the Governor, the appropriate executive official or officials affected thereby, and the governing body of the entity of the state or political subdivision of the state.

If the findings relate to an entity of the state, the Legislative Auditor shall also report the findings to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

If the findings relate to a prosecuting attorney's office, the Legislative Auditor shall also report the same to the Attorney General for review and appropriate action.

(1)The Legislative Auditor shall notify and cooperate with the appropriate prosecuting attorney on all matters that appear to involve a criminal offense.

Upon request and with the approval of the cochairs of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the Legislative Auditor shall cooperate in any other investigations by the appropriate prosecuting attorney, the Division of Arkansas State Police, or any other state or federal law enforcement agency.

(1)While the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is not established as an agency to effect through its own direct action the correction of improper practices of financial administration or the inadequacy of fiscal records, the prosecution of defaulting public officials, or the improvement of accounting systems in any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state, it is nevertheless determined that the action or nonaction on the part of the appropriate public officials in respect to the correction of the matters when called to their attention or in respect to the institution of criminal proceedings where proper, has pertinent bearing upon the question of the necessity for future remedial legislation.

It is for this reason that the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee is authorized to inform public officials to the extent provided by law of the findings of the Legislative Auditor in respect to any such matters.

(1)If the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee determines that an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state has not corrected the deficiencies noted in one (1) or more previous reports, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may request the prosecuting attorney of the judicial district in which the entity of the state or the political subdivision of the state is located to take appropriate action to assure that the records of the entity of the state or the political subdivision of the state are maintained in accordance with law.

If the prosecuting attorney fails or refuses to take appropriate action within a reasonable time after receipt of notice from the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee that an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state is not maintaining its records in substantial compliance with law, the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee may request the Attorney General to take such appropriate action as may be necessary to assure that the records of the entity of the state or political subdivision of the state are maintained in compliance with law.

(1)By June 30 of each year, the Attorney General and each prosecuting attorney to whom the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee or the Legislative Auditor has reported a matter under this section shall file with the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee a disposition report on the status of the matters that have not been previously reported as resolved to the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee.

A disposition report shall address all matters that have not been previously reported as resolved under subdivision (f)(1) of this section prior to and during the preceding calendar year.

A disposition report shall include without limitation:

The date the matter was reported to the Attorney General or the prosecuting attorney;

The amount of loss or funds unaccounted for in connection with the matter;

The status or disposition of the matter; and

Other comments pertinent to the investigation or disposition of the matter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2009, No. 446, § 1; 2015, No. 554, § 20.

10-4-420. Testimony before courts.

In all criminal or civil actions brought as the result of the findings set forth in any audit report of the Legislative Auditor, the Legislative Auditor or his or her assistants, upon request of the proper officers of the court shall give testimony and otherwise make their services available in the prosecution of any action.

The Legislative Auditor and his or her assistants shall not be entitled to witness fees for making the testimony.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7.

10-4-421. Subpoenas — Witnesses — Penalties for failure to appear — Perjury.

In connection with an audit of any entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state or an audit related to any transactions or relationships with the entities, the Legislative Auditor may subpoena records or summon and subpoena any person whose testimony may be desired or deemed necessary to appear before him or her at a time and place and with such papers, files, and records as may be named in the summons or subpoena.

In conducting any audit or examination, the Legislative Auditor or any authorized assistant has the authority to administer oaths.

Any person summoned to appear before the Legislative Auditor or any of his or her authorized assistants to testify or submit papers, files, and records as required in this section shall receive the same compensation as is received by persons serving as witnesses in circuit courts of this state.

(1)If any person subpoenaed to appear by the Legislative Auditor fails to appear or to produce books, documents, or records subpoenaed, the fact shall be certified to the circuit court of the county in which the hearing is held, and the circuit court shall punish the person for contempt in the same manner as punishment for contempt is imposed for failure to respond to a subpoena or directive of the circuit court.

If a person placed under oath or subpoenaed by the Legislative Auditor, his or her authorized assistants, or the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee knowingly gives false testimony that is material to an audit, that person shall be deemed guilty of perjury upon conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(1)(A)Subpoenas issued by the Legislative Auditor shall be served by the sheriff of the county in which the person, books, records, or documents subpoenaed are located.

The sheriff shall be entitled to the same fees for the service of process as provided by law for service of process issued by the circuit court.

However, at his or her option the Legislative Auditor may direct the Department of Arkansas State Police to serve any subpoena.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7.